Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1102.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3209(a) and 3210(b) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 3209(A) AND 3210(B), THE HEADING OF SUBCHAPTER B OF CHAPTER 32 AND SECTIONS 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3216, 3217, 3223 AND 3232 OF TITLE 51 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 3209. Administration.(a) Appropriation and administrative costs.--The General Assembly shall appropriate funds to pay full-time and part-time educational assistance grants under this subchapter. A portion <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 of the funds appropriated may be used to pay the costs of the administration of this subchapter and Subchapter B (relating to [Medical Officer or Health] Specialty Branch Officer Incentive Program).* * *§ 3210. Educational Assistance Program Fund.* * *(b) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and the interest the fund accrues are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to be used for the purposes provided for under this subchapter and Subchapter B (relating to [Medical Officer or Health] Specialty Branch Officer Incentive Program).* * *Section 2. The heading of Subchapter B of Chapter 32 and sections 3211, 3212, 3213, 3214, 3216, 3217, 3223 and 3232 of Title 51 of are amended to read:SUBCHAPTER B[MEDICAL OFFICER OR HEALTH ] SPECIALTY BRANCHOFFICER INCENTIVE PROGRAM§ 3211. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:["Behavioral health officer." An officer who:(1) holds a license to practice psychology under the act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act, or is a licensed clinical social worker as defined in section 3 of the act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act;20250HB1102PN1489 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) has malpractice insurance, is self-insured or maintains insurance through a private employer; and(3) meets any applicable Federal requirements for the Pennsylvania National Guard."Medical officer or health officer." An officer who is any of the following:(1) A resident physician.(2) A physician.(3) A physician assistant.(4) A behavioral health officer.(5) A public health officer or environmental science officer.]"Chaplain." An officer who serves in the United States Army Chaplain Corps."Health care officer." An officer who serves in one of the United States Air Force's following health care professions:(1) Doctor.(2) Nurse.(3) Dentist.(4) Allied Health.(5) Administration."JAG officer." An officer who serves in the United States Army Judge Advocate General's Corps."Medical officer." An officer who serves in one of the United States Army Medical Department's six corps:(1) Dental Corps.(2) Medical Corps.(3) Medical Services Corps.(4) Medical Specialist Corps.(5) Nurse Corps.20250HB1102PN1489 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Veterinary Corps."Member in good standing." A member of the Pennsylvania National Guard who meets all medical, training, physical and educational requirements for service and who is a satisfactory participant in all scheduled duties and training periods.["Physician." An officer assigned to and serving in anauthorized Army Medical Corps or Air Force Medical Corps position who:(1) has completed a medicine residency program; and(2) is currently practicing medicine in the United States or its territories."Physician assistant." An officer who:(1) is licensed as a physician assistant under the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985; and(2) meets any applicable Federal requirements for the Pennsylvania National Guard.]"Program." The [Medical Officer or Health ] Specialty Branch Officer Incentive Program.["Public health officer" or "environmental science officer." An officer who holds a minimum of a bachelor's degree from an educational program accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Secretary of Education in an environmental science related field of study, including any of the following majors or their equivalent:(1) Environmental science, environmental health or environmental management.(2) Occupational health.(3) Industrial hygiene.(4) Public health.20250HB1102PN1489 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Sanitary science or epidemiology.(6) Biology, chemistry, toxicology, geology, microbiology, biochemistry or zoology."Resident physician." An officer who:(1) is assigned to a medical position in the Pennsylvania National Guard;(2) is a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy participating in graduate training;(3) holds a license to practice medicine under the Medical Practice Act of 1985; and(4) meets any applicable Federal requirements for the Pennsylvania National Guard.]"Specialty branch officer." A chaplain, health care officer, JAG officer or medical officer.§ 3212. Establishment of program.The [Medical Officer or Health ] Specialty Branch Officer Incentive Program is established within the department to provide educational stipends to eligible [medical officers or health ] specialty branch officers in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.§ 3213. Program stipend.(a) [General rule] Stipend.--[(1) A resident physician, physician or physician assistant who meets the requirements under subsection (c) may receive a stipend of $1,000 per month for no more than 48 months of medicine residency or the first 36 accession months of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard.(2) A behavioral health officer, public health officer or environmental science officer who meets the requirements under subsection (c) may receive a stipend of $500 per month 20250HB1102PN1489 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for no more than the first 36 accession months of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard.](3) A medical officer or health care officer who is required to have obtained a doctoral degree for entry into the officer's military specialty and who meets the requirements under subsection (c) may receive a stipend of $1,000 per month for no more than 48 months of medicine MEDICAL residency or the first 36 accession months of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard.(4) A medical officer or health care officer who is required to have obtained a master's degree for entry into the officer's military specialty and who meets the requirements under subsection (c) may receive a stipend of $750 per month for no more than 48 months of medicine MEDICAL residency or the first 36 accession months of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard.(5) A medical officer or health care officer who is required to have obtained a bachelor's degree for entry into the officer's military specialty and who meets the requirements under subsection (c) may receive a stipend of $500 per month for no more than 48 months of medicine MEDICAL residency or the first 36 accession months of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard.(6) A JAG officer who is required to have obtained a juris doctor degree and a license to practice law in this Commonwealth for entry into the officer's military specialty and who meets the requirements under subsection (c) may receive a stipend of $750 per month for the first 36 accession months of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard.20250HB1102PN1489 - 6 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A chaplain who is required to obtain a bachelor's degree, an ecclesiastical endorsement and a seminary graduate degree, who is ordained for entry into the officer's military specialty and who meets the requirements under subsection (c), may receive a stipend of $750 per month for the first 36 accession months of service to the Pennsylvania National Guard.(b) Areas of concentration.--An area of concentration qualification for a medical or health care officer must be approved by the National Guard Bureau through a predetermination request completed by the Pennsylvania Army National Guard Army Medical Department Officer Strength Manager or the Pennsylvania Air National Guard State Air Surgeon .(b.1) Eligibility.--Medical officers and health care officers assigned to administrative, planning or logistical concentrations shall not be eligible for the program.(c) Requirements.--In order to qualify for a stipend under subsection (a), a [medical officer or health ] specialty branch officer [shall] must meet all of the following:(1) Be a member in good standing with the Pennsylvania National Guard.(2) Be assigned to an appropriate medical [or], health, legal or religious position in the Pennsylvania National Guard.(3) Agree to serve as a [medical officer or health ] specialty branch officer in the Pennsylvania National Guard [after completion of residency or initial service obligation] for a period of one month for each monthly stipend received. This service obligation shall be concurrent with any other military service obligation of the officer.20250HB1102PN1489 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) For a medical officer or health care officer, meet Federal and State licensing requirements to practice within the officer's medical specialty within this Commonwealth.(5) Meet any applicable Federal requirements for the Pennsylvania National Guard.(6) For a medical officer or health care officer, once licensed and eligible to be granted, maintain clinical privileges as awarded at the national guard level by the Centralized Credentials and Privileging Preparation Board.(d) Receipt of stipend.--A stipend under subsection (a) shall be paid to an eligible [medical officer or health ] specialty branch officer whose application for the stipend is approved at the completion of each month of residency or service. A [medical officer or health ] specialty branch officer may not receive a stipend under subsection (a) for more than 48 months during the period of service in the Pennsylvania National Guard.(e) Adjustments.--If the Adjutant General determines that the amount available for the program in any year will be insufficient to provide stipends in the amount described under subsection (a), the Adjutant General may place a cap on the number of [medical officers or health ] specialty branch officers eligible to receive stipends or may adjust the amount of the annual stipend.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a medical officer or health care officer who is serving in the Pennsylvania National Guard before the effective date of this section and who meets the requirements under subsection (c) from receiving a stipend under subsection (a) during the period of [medicine] medical residency or 20250HB1102PN1489 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service.§ 3214. Additional incentives.To the extent that funds are available, the Adjutant General may, by regulation, establish additional incentives to aid in the recruitment and retention of [medical officers or health ] specialty branch officers in the Pennsylvania National Guard, provided that payment of such additional incentives shall not result in a cap on participation or reduction in the amount of stipends paid under section 3213 (relating to program stipend).§ 3216. Recoupment of incentive payments.(a) [General rule] Recoupment.--A recipient of a stipend or other incentive payment under this subchapter who fails to complete [his] the recipient's service obligation or to meet other requirements established by the Adjutant General is liable to the Commonwealth for repayment of all incentive payments made. The Adjutant General shall notify the department if the recipient fails to complete the service obligation, and the promissory note under section 3215 (relating to promissory note) shall be called to secure payment in full upon demand on a schedule as the department may determine.(b) Forgiveness of recoupment.--The Adjutant General may forgive recoupment of all or part of a recipient's stipend or other incentive payment if the Adjutant General determines that [his] the recipient's failure to fulfill the service obligation was the result of [his] the recipient's death, discharge because of disability incurred in line of duty, discharge because of a medical determination that [he] the recipient is medically unfit for duty when the medical condition is outside [his] the recipient's control and is not due to [his] the recipient's misconduct, mandatory discharge, release or retirement for age 20250HB1102PN1489 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or years of service or discharge, release, transfer or retirement because of other compelling circumstances outside [his] the recipient's control.§ 3217. Adjustment of stipend amounts.Beginning [on January 1, 2016] with calendar year 2026, and every [two] five years thereafter, the Adjutant General may adjust, by notice published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin, the amounts of the stipends [set forth] specified in this subchapter by an amount equal to the change in the applicable Consumer Price Index in the preceding [two] five years provided that the Adjutant General finds sufficient funds are appropriated and available to pay for the adjusted stipends.§ 3223. Eligibility.An eligible member may [apply for participation] participate in the program if the eligible member does or meets all of the following:[(1) Has been a satisfactory participant in Pennsylvania National Guard activities for a minimum service period established by the Adjutant General or is a former eligible member and has received a discharge other than a dishonorable discharge.](2) [Has accepted] Accepts an obligation to serve in the Pennsylvania National Guard for a period of at least eight years and [has not accepted an obligation] is not receiving benefits under Subchapter A (relating to Educational Assistance Program) or A.1 (relating to Military Family Education Program) for the same service period. The service obligation to the Pennsylvania National Guard shall be two years as a cadet in the military college and eight years as a commissioned officer.20250HB1102PN1489 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Serves as a Simultaneous Membership Program cadet in the Pennsylvania National Guard and accepts a Pennsylvania National Guard commission upon graduation from the military college.(4) Provides proof of United States citizenship.(5) Provides proof of meeting physical standards[, in effect on the effective date of this section,] required to be considered to serve in the United States Army.(6) Provides proof of meeting academic standards[, in effect on the effective date of this section,] required to be considered to serve in the United States Army as a commissioned officer.(7) Provides a letter of intent.(8) Provides a letter of acceptance into the Early Commissioning Program.§ 3232. Administration.The General Assembly may appropriate funds to pay for grants under Subchapter B (relating to [Medical Officer or Health] Specialty Branch Officer Incentive Program).Section 3 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1102PN1489 - 11 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920